Hawaii statutes.
§437B-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Board" means the motor vehicle
repair industry board.

"Certified mechanic" is a motor
vehicle mechanic who has successfully passed the certification tests in any or
all of the certification specialties set forth in this chapter.

"Chlorofluorocarbon" or
"CFC" means any member of the family of substances containing carbon,
fluorine, and chlorine, including, without limitation, those compounds known as
CFC-11, CFC-12, CFC-13, CFC-14, CFC-113, CFC-114, CFC-115, CFC-116, CFC-500,
CFC-502, and CFC-503, and any combination or mixture containing any of these
chlorofluorocarbon compounds.

"Crash parts" means motor vehicle
replacement parts, either sheet metal or plastic, which constitute the visible
exterior of the vehicle, including inner and outer panels, and which are
repaired or replaced as the result of a collision.

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Hydrochlorofluorocarbon" or
"HCFC" means any member of the family of substances containing
hydrogen, carbon, fluorine, and chlorine, including, without limitation, those
compounds known as HCFC-22 and HCFC-123, and any combination or mixture
containing any of these hydrochlorofluorocarbon compounds.

"Licensed mechanic" means a motor
vehicle mechanic who has been licensed in accordance with this chapter.

"Mobile air conditioner" means an air
conditioner designed for installation in a motor vehicle.

"Motor vehicle" means any passenger
car, truck, truck tractor, motorcycle, or motor scooter, as defined in section
286-2, and the integral parts thereof.

"Motor vehicle mechanic" means any
person whether self-employed or employed by another, who, for compensation,
engages in the diagnosis or repair of malfunctions of motor vehicles, and may
be classified as "intermediate" or "journey worker" as the
terms are commonly used in the motor vehicle repair industry.

"Motor vehicle mechanic helper" means
any person who, for compensation, engages in the diagnosis or repair of
malfunctions of motor vehicles under the supervision of a licensed motor
vehicle mechanic.

"Motor vehicle repair dealer" means
any person who is, or has in the person's employ, a motor vehicle mechanic
licensed under this chapter and who, for compensation, engages in the business
of diagnosing or repairing malfunctions of motor vehicles.

"Refrigerant recovery and recycling
equipment" means a device used to recover and to purify CFCs for later
reuse.

"Repair of motor vehicles" means all
maintenance of and modifications and repairs to motor vehicles, including the
rebuilding or restoring of rebuilt vehicles as defined in section 286-2, but
excluding repairing tires, changing tires, lubricating vehicles, installing
light bulbs, batteries, windshield wiper blades, and other minor accessories,
cleaning, adjusting, and replacing spark plugs, replacing oil and air filters,
and other minor services, which the board by rule determines may be performed
by persons without the skills and knowledge required of motor vehicle mechanics
and helpers. No service shall be designated as minor, for purposes of this
section, if the board finds that performance of the service requires mechanical
expertise, has given rise to a high incidence of fraud or deceptive practices,
or involves a part of the vehicle essential to its safe operation. [L 1975, c
143, pt of §2; am L 1977, c 34, §1; am L 1982, c 78, §1 and c 204, §8; am L
1984, c 276, §10; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 272, §1; am L 1988, c 329, §1; am L
1989, c 77, §5; am L 1990, c 316, §4; am L 1992, c 264, §5; am L 1993, c 110,
§2 and c 202, §§2, 4; gen ch 1993; am L 1998, c 199, §1]

Cross References

Ozone layer protection, see chapter 342C.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next